District of Columbia statutes.
38-610

Reporting and studies of lead poisoning tests.

(a)

The Mayor shall establish requirements for the mandatory reporting of all lead poisoning tests conducted in the District of Columbia.

(b)

The Mayor shall use the data collected in subsection (a) of this section to conduct an epidemiological study for the purpose of preventing future lead poisoning. The Mayor shall submit the study to the Council of the District of Columbia within 2 years from October 15, 1993.

History

Dec. 3, 1985, D.C. Law 6-66, § 10a
as added Oct. 15, 1993, D.C. Law 10-29, § 2(f), 40 DCR 5752

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2410.